Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2639.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin ALLIED HEALTH TECHNICIAN SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The commissioner of the Office of Higher Education shall establish a program to provide up to 1,000 scholarships to students entering specified health technician programs by 2028. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Eligible students. new text end new text begin (a) To be eligible for a scholarship under this section, a student must: new text end new text begin (1) apply in the form and manner specified by the commissioner; new text end new text begin (2) be a resident student, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 136A.101, subdivision 8; new text end new text begin (3) attend an eligible institution, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 136A.101, subdivision 4; new text end new text begin (4) be enrolled in the student's first term in a nationally accredited degree, diploma, or certificate program in one of the following health technician fields: new text end new text begin (i) medical laboratory technologist; new text end new text begin (ii) medical laboratory technician; new text end new text begin (iii) respiratory therapist; new text end new text begin (iv) radiology technologist; or new text end new text begin (v) surgical technologist; new text end new text begin (5) submit to the commissioner a completed affidavit, prescribed by the commissioner, affirming the student's intent to work in the specified health technician field following graduation; and new text end new text begin (6) agree to provide the commissioner, in a manner and by a date prescribed by the commissioner, the location and type of health care facility where the award recipient is employed following completion of the health technician program. new text end new text begin (b) A student may receive a scholarship under this section only once. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Administration; award amount. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must establish an application process and other guidelines for implementing this program. The first set of scholarships must be awarded for the 2026-2027 academic year. new text end new text begin (b) The amount of a scholarship awarded under this section is $5,000. The scholarship must be paid in a lump sum directly to the institution where the recipient is enrolled. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Reporting. new text end new text begin By February 1, 2027, and again by February 1, 2028, the commissioner must submit a report on the program to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over higher education finance and policy. The report must include the following information as well as any other information the commissioner considers relevant: new text end new text begin (1) information about all postsecondary health technician programs giving rise to eligibility for a scholarship under this section, including the programs' locations, costs, enrollment capacities, acceptance rates, and other relevant information; new text end new text begin (2) information about the locations and types of health care facilities where the award recipients are employed following completion of a health technician program; new text end new text begin (3) available data on the current and forecasted demand for health technicians in Minnesota; and new text end new text begin (4) the total number of scholarships issued, organized by: new text end new text begin (i) year of award; new text end new text begin (ii) postsecondary institution attended; new text end new text begin (iii) health technician field; and new text end new text begin (iv) relevant and available demographic data about award recipients. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin This section expires June 30, 2028. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ALLIED HEALTH TECHNICIAN SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM.new text end new text begin (a) $5,380,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Office of Higher Education for the allied health technician scholarship program under section 1. Of this amount: new text end new text begin (1) $5,000,000 is for awarding 1,000 student scholarships; new text end new text begin (2) $230,000 is for promotion of the program and student recruitment efforts; and new text end new text begin (3) $150,000 is for administering the program. new text end new text begin (b) This is a onetime appropriation. This appropriation is available until expended or until June 30, 2028, whichever occurs first. new text end